New York, session 2025-2026, A6883.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph 1 of subsection (aa) of section 606 of the tax 2 law, as amended by section 1 of part E of chapter 59 of the laws of 3 2020, is amended to read as follows: 4 (1) Residents. There shall be allowed a credit against the tax imposed 5 by this article in an amount equal to twenty percent of the premiums 6 paid during the taxable year for long-term care insurance. [The credit 7 amount shall not exceed one thousand five hundred dollars and shall be 8 allowed only if the amount of New York adjusted gross income required to 9 be reported on the return is less than two hundred fifty thousand 10 dollars.] In order to qualify for such credit, the taxpayer's premium 11 payment must be for the purchase of or for continuing coverage under a 12 long-term care insurance policy that qualifies for such credit pursuant 13 to section one thousand one hundred seventeen of the insurance law. If 14 the amount of the credit allowable under this subsection for any taxable 15 year shall exceed the taxpayer's tax for such year, the excess may be 16 carried over to the following year or years and may be deducted from the 17 taxpayer's tax for such year or years. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to taxable 19 years beginning on and after January 1, 2025. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09375-01-5